Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-906
Drainage fund; levy; special fund.

The money raised from the levy provided in section 31-905 shall be used for the expenses of the county board in operating under the provisions of sections 31-901 to 31-933 and shall be kept by the county treasurer in a special fund for that purpose.

Laws 1959, c. 132, § 6, p. 486.